Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-3201
Act, how cited.

Sections 13-3201 to 13-3211 shall be known and may be cited as the Property Assessed Clean Energy Act.

Laws 2016, LB1012, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,2016, § 18-3201;

Laws 2017, LB625, § 1.